Utah statutes.
77-27-30.   Violation by parolee or probationer supervised in another state -- Hearing in other state -- Procedure upon receipt of record from other state.

In any case of alleged parole or probation violation by a person being supervised in another state pursuant to the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers, any appropriate judicial or administrative officer or agency in another state is authorized to hold a hearing on the alleged violation. Upon receipt of the record of a parole or probation violation hearing held in another state pursuant to a statute substantially similar to this act, the record shall have the same standing and effect as though the proceeding of which it is a record was had before the appropriate officer or officers in this state, and any recommendations contained in or accompanying the record shall be fully considered by the appropriate officer or officers of this state in making disposition of the matter.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

